Wisconsin, session 2025, AB59.
do enact as follows:AB59,11Section 1. 281.61 (2r) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB59,2,82281.61 (2r) (e) Using funds received as federal capitalization grants under 42 3USC 300j-12, any other method that is consistent with the federal program for safe 4drinking water state loan funds under 42 USC 300j-12 or any other federal law 5providing funding for or otherwise relating to that program, except that funds 6received as federal capitalization grants may not be used to provide principal 7forgiveness, other than forgiveness of loans for the replacement of lead service lines, 8to a private owner of a community water system.AB59,2,99